Wyoming statutes. Title 25 Institutions of the State
Article 1. General Provisions
§ 25-10-112.
Liability for costs of detention, involuntary hospitalization and proceedings therefor. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

Subject to the provisions of subsections (d) and (e) of this section, the county in which a person is detained or in which involuntary hospitalization proceedings are brought shall pay the costs of:

The first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday that falls within the seventy-two (72) hours, pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

, including costs of medical treatment for those conditions:

That resulted in the emergency detention of the person; or

That are attributable to affirmative actions taken by the person that have placed the person in danger of suicide or serious bodily harm and require immediate medical attention.

Proceedings for detention or involuntary hospitalization pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

or

25-10-110

. The costs of these proceedings include the cost of appointed counsel and examiners;

Clothing, if the person does not have and cannot afford to purchase adequate clothing; and

Costs incurred under W.S. 25-10-125(b).

Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, when a detained person or proposed patient is not a resident of Wyoming, the department shall pay the costs listed in paragraphs (a)(i) through (iii) of this section.

The county shall pay for the first seventy-two (72) hours as provided in subsection (a) of this section even if the patient waives the hearing required under W.S.

25-10-109

and proceeds to voluntary outpatient treatment, directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization proceedings. Subject to the provisions of subsections (d) and (e) of this section, if continued emergency detention is ordered pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

(k)(iii), the county’s liability for any costs of detention, treatment or transportation shall terminate after the first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. The department shall be responsible for those costs after the expiration of the county’s responsibility for payments of the costs. All costs of treatment, transportation and continued emergency detention incurred after the first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, shall be paid by:

The department for persons hospitalized in the state hospital; and

The department for persons hospitalized in other hospitals, consistent with W.S. 25-10-110(j) and

25-10-104

.

The hospital or other treatment provider shall attempt to recover all costs of treatment from public and private health insurance and from government benefit programs, including the veterans’ administration, the Indian health service of the United States department of health and human services and any other federal agency that may be responsible for the costs of treatment, prior to seeking payment from the county or the department. The hospital or other treatment provider shall have discharged its obligation to recover costs under this subsection if it:

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 3.

Certifies to the county or the department that:

The patient has no public or private health insurance;

There are no other government benefit programs from which it can recover the costs of treatment; and

If the patient might qualify for benefits, payment has been denied after submitting a written demand for payment to all federal agencies that may be responsible for the costs of treatment, including the veterans’ administration and the Indian health service of the United States department of health and human services. Payment shall be deemed denied if a written demand for payment is made and no response is received within three (3) months of being properly submitted. If a demand is paid after having been deemed denied under this subparagraph, and after the county or department has paid the hospital or other treatment provider, the amount of the demand payment shall be remitted to the county or department, whichever entity paid the hospital or other treatment provider. If a county or the department has paid a hospital or other treatment provider, the county or the department shall have a subrogation right against any entity to whom the hospital or provider sent a written demand.

When a person is detained under W.S.

25-10-109

, the county in which the person resided shall be liable for costs of treatment for the first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday that falls within the seventy-two (72) hours. If the person remains in detention after the hearing pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

(k)(iii), the department shall directly, or under contract with local providers, provide treatment for those conditions specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section until the person is released from detention or involuntary commitment is ordered, subject to payment of costs as provided in this subsection or subsection (c) of this section.

For purposes of this section, “costs” shall not include the expenses for any medical procedures that are not:

Related to the assessment of or necessary treatment for the suspected mental illness; or

Otherwise specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

The department in consultation with each board of county commissioners may establish a single point of responsibility or gatekeeper. Gatekeeper duties shall include, but are not limited to, providing guidance on issues of detention and involuntary treatment and monitoring and coordinating timely, efficient and effective patient treatment prior to, during and after any emergency detention or involuntary treatment under this act. No gatekeeper designated under this subsection shall provide inpatient psychiatric treatment to patients under this act, unless the gatekeeper has been approved by the department of health to provide these services.

The county attorney shall notify the department and any gatekeeper of any detention, continued emergency detention order, directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization order within twenty-four (24) hours.

The department, boards of county commissioners, designated hospitals, gatekeepers and other treatment providers may, upon contract or agreement, coordinate and monitor the services and payments required for the treatment of persons with mental illness as provided under this section. Pursuant to contract or agreement, the department may assume any part of the expenses associated with a gatekeeper which expenses would otherwise be the responsibility of a county under this act, including expenses for the transportation of patients to appropriate care settings.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 25-64; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-116; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 27, § 1; 1989, ch. 50, § 2; ch. 147, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1997, ch. 35, § 1; 2001, ch. 195, § 1; 2006, ch. 111, § 1; 2007, ch. 79, § 1; 2008, ch. 37, § 1; ch. 116, § 1; 2009, ch. 12, § 1; 2010, ch. 79, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, §§ 2, 3, effective March 11, 2016; 2017 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “department,” see § 25-10-101(a)(iii).

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (c), in part, substituted “continued emergency detention” for “involuntary hospitalization,” substituted “25-10-109(k)(iii)” for “25-10-110;” in (e), inserted “in which the person resided,” substituted “continued emergency detention is ordered, whichever occurs first” for “a hearing required under W.S. 25-10-109(h),” and deleted the last sentence concerning the liability of cost for a person detained under W.S.

25-10-110

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote subsection (c) by clarifying that the liability of costs, transportation and treatment will be terminated after the first seventy-two (72) hours including weekends and legal holidays; in (e) deleted “, or until continued emergency detention is ordered, whichever occurs first.” and inserted “subject to payment of costs as provided in subsections (c) and (e) of this section.” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.—

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2008, in (a)(i), deleted “demanding” at the end, and made stylistic changes; inserted (a)(i)(A) and (a)(i)(B), except for “immediate medical attention” at the end of (a)(i)(B); and added (f).

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, § 1, made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence in the introductory language of (d), and inserted (d)(i) and (d)(ii).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(iv); in (e), substituted “treatment for those conditions specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section” for “psychiatric treatment”; added (g), and made related changes.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 102 § 2, in (c), added the present first sentence and deleted the former next-to-last sentence, which read, “The county attorney shall notify the department of the continued emergency detention order or involuntary hospitalization order within twenty-four (24) hours”; in (d), deleted “from patients” following “insurance”; rewrote (g), which formerly read “Each board of county commissioners may establish a single point of responsibility to identify, make referrals to, intervene and coordinate with community or regional resources prior to and after an emergency detention. The single point of responsibility may be assigned to a community mental health center, designated hospital or other entity that is able to provide treatment as defined under this act”; and added (h) and (j).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 102 § 3, repealed (d)(i), which read: “Has obtained or made reasonable effort to obtain from the patient or the patient's legally designated representative an affidavit showing the patient's financial condition which would support certification of the facts under paragraph (ii) of this subsection; and.”

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (d), added “including the veterans' administration, the Indian health service of the United States department of health and human services and any other federal agency that may be responsible for the costs of treatment”; added the (d)(ii)(A) and (d)(ii)(B) designations, added (d)(ii)(C), and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, in (g), added the second and fourth sentences; and added the last sentence in (j).

Cited

in

C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004).

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 6, 2013).

§ 25-10-112.
Liability for costs of detention, involuntary hospitalization and proceedings therefor. [Effective July 1, 2024]

Subject to the provisions of subsections (d) and (e) of this section, the county in which a person is detained or in which involuntary hospitalization proceedings are brought shall pay the costs of:

The first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday that falls within the seventy-two (72) hours, pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

, including costs of medical treatment for those conditions:

That resulted in the emergency detention of the person; or

That are attributable to affirmative actions taken by the person that have placed the person in danger of suicide or serious bodily harm and require immediate medical attention.

Proceedings for detention or involuntary hospitalization pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

or

25-10-110

. The costs of these proceedings include the cost of appointed counsel and examiners;

Clothing, if the person does not have and cannot afford to purchase adequate clothing; and

Costs incurred under W.S. 25-10-125(b).

Subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section, when a detained person or proposed patient is not a resident of Wyoming, the department shall pay the costs listed in paragraphs (a)(i) through (iii) of this section.

The county shall pay for the first seventy-two (72) hours as provided in subsection (a) of this section even if the patient waives the hearing required under W.S.

25-10-109

and proceeds to voluntary outpatient treatment, directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization proceedings. Subject to the provisions of subsections (d) and (e) of this section, if continued emergency detention is ordered pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

(k)(iii), the county’s liability for any costs of detention, treatment or transportation shall terminate after the first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday. The department shall be responsible for those costs after the expiration of the county’s responsibility for payments of the costs. All costs of treatment, transportation and continued emergency detention incurred after the first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, shall be paid by:

The department for persons hospitalized in the state hospital; and

The department for persons hospitalized in other hospitals, consistent with W.S. 25-10-110(j) and

25-10-104

.

The hospital or other treatment provider shall attempt to recover all costs of treatment from public and private health insurance and from government benefit programs, including the veterans’ administration, the Indian health service of the United States department of health and human services and any other federal agency that may be responsible for the costs of treatment, prior to seeking payment from the county or the department. The hospital or other treatment provider shall have discharged its obligation to recover costs under this subsection if it:

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 3.

Certifies to the county or the department that:

The patient has no public or private health insurance;

There are no other government benefit programs from which it can recover the costs of treatment; and

If the patient might qualify for benefits, payment has been denied after submitting a written demand for payment to all federal agencies that may be responsible for the costs of treatment, including the veterans’ administration and the Indian health service of the United States department of health and human services. Payment shall be deemed denied if a written demand for payment is made and no response is received within three (3) months of being properly submitted. If a demand is paid after having been deemed denied under this subparagraph, and after the county or department has paid the hospital or other treatment provider, the amount of the demand payment shall be remitted to the county or department, whichever entity paid the hospital or other treatment provider. If a county or the department has paid a hospital or other treatment provider, the county or the department shall have a subrogation right against any entity to whom the hospital or provider sent a written demand.

When a person is detained under W.S.

25-10-109

, the county in which the person resided shall be liable for costs of treatment for the first seventy-two (72) hours of detention, in addition to any Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday that falls within the seventy-two (72) hours. If the person remains in detention after the hearing pursuant to W.S.

25-10-109

(k)(iii), the department shall directly, or under contract with local providers, provide treatment for those conditions specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section until the person is released from detention or involuntary commitment is ordered, subject to payment of costs as provided in this subsection or subsection (c) of this section.

For purposes of this section, “costs” shall not include the expenses for any medical procedures that are not:

Related to the assessment of or necessary treatment for the suspected mental illness; or

Otherwise specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

The department in consultation with each board of county commissioners may establish a single point of responsibility or gatekeeper. The department and each board of county commissioners shall give preference to a behavioral health center as defined by W.S. 35-1-613(a)(xvi) as the single point of responsibility. Gatekeeper duties shall include, but are not limited to, providing guidance on issues of detention and involuntary treatment and monitoring and coordinating timely, efficient and effective patient treatment prior to, during and after any emergency detention or involuntary treatment under this act. No behavioral health center designated under this subsection shall charge fees for gatekeeping services provided under this article. No gatekeeper designated under this subsection shall provide inpatient psychiatric treatment to patients under this act, unless the gatekeeper has been approved by the department of health to provide these services.

The county attorney shall notify the department and any gatekeeper of any detention, continued emergency detention order, directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization order within twenty-four (24) hours.

The department, boards of county commissioners, designated hospitals, gatekeepers and other treatment providers may, upon contract or agreement, coordinate and monitor the services and payments required for the treatment of persons with mental illness as provided under this section. Pursuant to contract or agreement, the department may assume any part of the expenses associated with a gatekeeper which expenses would otherwise be the responsibility of a county under this act, including expenses for the transportation of patients to appropriate care settings. The department may only assume any part of the expenses associated with a gatekeeper when the gatekeeper has been contracted through a behavioral health center as defined by W.S. 35-1-613(a)(xvi).

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 25-64; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-116; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 27, § 1; 1989, ch. 50, § 2; ch. 147, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1997, ch. 35, § 1; 2001, ch. 195, § 1; 2006, ch. 111, § 1; 2007, ch. 79, § 1; 2008, ch. 37, § 1; ch. 116, § 1; 2009, ch. 12, § 1; 2010, ch. 79, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, §§ 2, 3, effective March 11, 2016; 2017 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 25-10-113.
Duties of head of hospital upon admission; treatment of patients primarily needing medical care.

As soon as possible but not later than seven (7) days after a patient is admitted to a hospital under this act, the head of the hospital shall:

Review the patient’s record;

Examine the patient; and

Develop an initial plan of treatment for the patient.

If the medical staff of the state hospital determines that a patient’s primary need for care is medical as opposed to psychiatric, the head of the state hospital may refuse to admit the patient if the state hospital has limited medical facilities or staff to provide for the necessary medical needs of the patient. If admittance is refused, the patient shall be transported to a medical facility that is qualified to meet the medical needs of the patient.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 25-65; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-117; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; ch. 217, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

§ 25-10-114.
Transfer of inmates of penal institutions to state hospital; notice.

The department of corrections may transfer an inmate of a state penal institution who is mentally ill to the state hospital, subject to the rules of admission of the department, if adequate treatment cannot be provided at a state penal institution.

Not less than five (5) days before an inmate is transferred pursuant to this section, the department of corrections shall give written notice to the court which ordered imprisonment, the inmate and the person responsible for his care or custody. The notice shall include:

The grounds for the transfer;

The inmate’s right to contest the transfer;

The inmate’s right to a hearing before he is transferred; and

The inmate’s right to counsel.

The transfer of an inmate of a state penal institution to the state hospital shall not exceed the term of imprisonment imposed by the sentencing court unless proceedings for involuntary hospitalization are instituted under W.S.

25-10-110

.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 25-66; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-118; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "department " for "state hospital" in (a).

Court lacks jurisdiction to sentence person to state hospital. —

Jurisdiction has not been given to the trial court to sentence a person to the Wyoming state hospital as part of the penalty for criminal activity. Dean v. State, 668 P.2d 639,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1983) (decided prior to 1983 revision of §

6-3-101

).

Clear and convincing standard met. —

Where defendant was mentally ill and the penal institution could not provide adequate treatment, the letters and testimony of two experts clearly and convincingly justified defendant's transfer to the Page v. State, 949 P.2d 466,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1997).

Cited in

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Hospital's liability for mentally deranged patient's self-inflicted injuries, 36 ALR4th 117.

Hospital's liability for patient's injury or death resulting from escape or attempted escape, 37 ALR4th 200.

Propriety of transferring patient found not guilty by reason of insanity to less restrictive confinement, 43 ALR5th 777.

§ 25-10-115.
Transfer of patients to another hospital; notice.

A hospital may transfer a patient hospitalized under this act to another hospital if the transfer is in the best interest of the patient. An involuntarily hospitalized patient who is so transferred retains the status of an involuntarily hospitalized patient under W.S.

25-10-110

.

Not less than five (5) days before a patient is transferred, the head of the hospital shall give written notice to the court, the patient, and the person responsible for his care or custody. The notice shall include:

The grounds for the transfer;

The patient’s right to contest the transfer;

The patient’s right to a hearing before he is transferred; and

The patient’s right to counsel.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 25-67; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-119; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

§ 25-10-116.
Periodic examinations of patients; determination of discharge or continued hospitalization; notice; hearing.

Three (3) months after each patient’s admission to the hospital, the head of the hospital shall evaluate the progress of each patient and shall reevaluate the treatment and progress every six (6) months thereafter. The evaluation shall consider whether directed outpatient commitment is appropriate.

When the head of a hospital determines after the examination required by subsection (a) of this section or by W.S.

25-10-113

that the conditions justifying hospitalization of involuntary patients no longer exist, he shall report his determination to the court, the county attorney, the district attorney, family members and the mental health center which were involved in the initial proceedings. Unless, within three (3) days after the notice is sent, the court upon motion orders a hearing on continuing the patient’s hospitalization, the head of the hospital shall discharge the patient. The hearing shall be held as soon as practicable and shall follow the procedures in W.S.

25-10-118

. Notice of the hearing shall conform with W.S. 25-10-116(c).

When the head of a hospital determines after an evaluation required by subsection (a) of this section or by W.S.

25-10-113

that the conditions justifying hospitalization continue to exist, he shall send to the court notice of his determination and a detailed statement of the factual basis for the determination. The court may order a hearing to review the determination. The head of the hospital shall also send notice of his determination to the patient and the person responsible for his care or custody. The notice shall include:

The patient’s right to contest the determination;

The patient’s right to a hearing; and

The patient’s right to counsel.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 25-68; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-120; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “W.S.

25-10-118

” for “W.S.

25-10-117

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19. 2004.

The 2016 amendment

added the last sentence of (a).

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

County's authority.

Trial court did not err in holding that a county attorney had no right to object to the discharge of a patient who had been involuntarily hospitalized because the plain language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 25-10-116(b) did not give county attorneys the authority to object to a patient's discharge from involuntary civil commitment or to obtain review of the Wyoming State Hospital's decision to release a patient from involuntary hospitalization. State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15, 294 P.3d 24,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 25-10-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 147, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 21, related to release on convalescent status.

§ 25-10-118.
Objections to proposed transfer or continued hospitalization; notice; hearing; options of court.

A hearing shall be conducted in accordance with this section when a patient contests one (1) of the following actions:

Transfer pursuant to W.S.

25-10-114

or

25-10-115

;

Continuing hospitalization pursuant to W.S.

25-10-116

; or

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 147, § 2.

Revocation of convalescent status release pursuant to W.S.

25-10-127

.

Unless otherwise provided, an objection shall be filed with the court within five (5) days of receipt of notice of the intended action. The court shall set a hearing date which shall be within fourteen (14) days of receipt of the objection. If an objection is not filed within five (5) days, or if the patient consents to the action, the court may enter an ex parte order authorizing the action.

The hearing shall be before the court, without a jury. If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

The transfer or continuing hospitalization is justified, the court shall enter an order authorizing the transfer or continuing hospitalization; or

The transfer or continuing hospitalization is not justified, the court shall enter an order prohibiting the transfer or continuing hospitalization.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 25-70; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-122; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 172, § 2.

Clear and convincing standard met. —

Where defendant was mentally ill and the penal institution could not provide adequate treatment, the letters and testimony of two experts clearly and convincingly justified defendant's transfer to the Page v. State, 949 P.2d 466,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1997).

Right to object. —

Trial court did not err in holding that a county attorney had no
right to object to the discharge of a patient who had been involuntarily
hospitalized; the civil commitment statutes were written to ensure
that the head of a hospital or other medical professionals determine
a patient's eligibility for discharge, and to provide that only the
patient might object and obtain a hearing as provided in the statute. State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15, 294 P.3d 24,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 25-10-119.
Mechanical restraints; uses and reasons therefor recorded.

Mechanical restraints shall not be applied to any patient, unless the head of the hospital determines that the medical needs of the patient require them. The head of the hospital shall record every use of a mechanical restraint and the reasons for its use in the clinical record of the patient and sign the record.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 25-71; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-123; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Criminal responsibility for physical measures undertaken in connection with treatment of mentally disordered patient, 99 ALR3d 854.

Civil liability for physical measures undertaken in connection with treatment of mentally disordered patient, 8 ALR4th 464.

§ 25-10-120.
Rights of patients; commitment and treatment of persons being treated by prayer.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations creating a bill of patient rights and establishing the procedures by which those rights may be enforced, limited or denied.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 147, § 2.

No person who is being treated in good faith by spiritual means alone, through prayer, by a duly accredited practitioner in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination may be detained, hospitalized or ordered to receive treatment under this act unless:

A court finds by clear and convincing evidence that he is mentally ill; or

If the person is a minor or is incompetent his parent or guardian consents to detention, hospitalization or treatment.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 25-72; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-124; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

For constitutional prohibitions against special and local laws affecting estates of those under disability, see art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provision excluding mentally incompetent persons or persons convicted of felonies from elective franchise, see art. 6, § 6, Wyo. Const.

As to age of majority and rights upon emancipation, see §

14-1-101

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (d), see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Civil liability for physical measures undertaken in connection with treatment of mentally disordered patient, 8 ALR4th 464.

Construction and application of state patient bill of rights statutes, 87 ALR5th 277.

§ 25-10-121.
Admission not to create presumption as to competency nor ground for guardianship.

Admission to a hospital under this act shall not create any presumption with respect to the patient’s mental or legal competency to exercise civil, contractual or other rights for which a legal standard of competency exists. Admission to a hospital under this act is not sufficient cause for guardianship of the person or estate of any patient.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 25-73; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-125; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both sentences, see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

§ 25-10-122.
Records to be kept confidential; exceptions.

Records and reports made under this act which directly or indirectly identify a patient, a former patient or an individual for whom an application for directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization has been filed, shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person unless:

The patient or, if he is a minor or incompetent, his parent or guardian, consents;

Disclosure is necessary to carry out this act; or

A court determines disclosure is necessary for the conduct of proceedings before it and failure to disclose would be contrary to the public interest.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 147, § 2.

Patient records identified in subsection (a) of this section may be provided without consent of the patient, parent or guardian by and between a mental health center, the state hospital and hospitals designated under W.S.

25-10-104

, only for the purpose of facilitating referral treatment, admission, readmission or transfer of the patient under this act.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 25-74; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-126; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2016 ch. 102, § 2, effective March 11, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to transfer of patients between states, see § 25-10-124(d).

As to public records generally, see §§

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “or” in (a)(ii); and made related changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2016 amendment

inserted “directed outpatient commitment or involuntary hospitalization” in (a).

Laws 2016, ch. 102, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 25-10-123.
Discharge of patient held on order in action arising out of criminal offense.

A patient held on order of a court having criminal jurisdiction in any action or proceeding arising out of a criminal offense shall not be discharged except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction. At any time the head of the hospital is of the opinion that the person is no longer affected by mental illness or deficiency, or that he no longer presents a substantial risk of danger to himself or others, the head of the hospital shall apply to the court which committed the person for an order of discharge. The court having criminal jurisdiction in the matter shall conduct a hearing not less than once each year to determine whether the continued hospitalization of the patient is necessary, based on the reports required under W.S.

25-10-116

and any other information provided to the court by the state hospital or the federal hospital under W.S.

25-10-111

, as appropriate, or the patient’s counsel. After a hearing, the court shall make its findings and enter an order as provided in W.S. 25-10-118(c).

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 25-75; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-127; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to trial of persons lacking mental capacity and pleas of not guilty by reason of mental illness or deficiency, see §§

7-11-301

through

7-11-307

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the provisions beginning “At any time.”

Cited

in

C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 25-10-124.
Transfer of patients between states.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 147, § 2.

Transfer of patients between states shall be governed by the Interstate Compact on Mental Health, W.S.

25-10-301

.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 25-76; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-128; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 50, § 2; ch. 147, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

For provisions of Interstate Compact on Mental Health, see article 3 of this chapter.

§ 25-10-125.
Clothing and transportation upon discharge.

The department, pursuant to W.S.

25-10-112

shall ensure that a patient discharged from the state’s custody possesses suitable clothing and adequate means to ensure his arrival at the home from which he was admitted or another place within the state, which is in the best interests of the state and of the patient.

The county responsible for payment of costs pursuant to W.S. 25-10-112(a) shall ensure that a patient discharged from emergency detention within seventy-two (72) hours, or upon expiration of emergency detention after seventy-two (72) hours without a court order for hospitalization under W.S.

25-10-110

, possesses suitable clothing and adequate means to ensure his arrival at the home from which he was admitted or another place, which is in the best interests of the county and of the patient.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 25-77; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-129; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 147, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2010, ch. 79, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), inserted “from the state's custody”; and added (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a) and (b), substituted "ensure" for "insure" throughout.

§ 25-10-126.
Penalties for unwarranted hospitalization or denial of rights.

A person who willfully causes the unwarranted hospitalization of any individual under this act [§§

25-10-101

through

25-10-305

] is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or both.

A person who willfully denies any individual any of the rights accorded to him under this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 188, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 25-89; W.S. 1977, § 25-3-141; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 24, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections (a) and (b), see § 25-10-101(a)(xiv) and notes thereto.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Civil liability for physical measures undertaken in connection with treatment of mentally disordered patient, 8 ALR4th 464.